Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-404
Consolidation; property.

When a city or village is annexed to another pursuant to section 17-402, the property, both real and personal, notes, bonds, obligations, accounts, demands, evidences of debt, rights, choses in action, franchises, books, records, maps, plats, and effects of every nature, of and belonging to the city or village so annexed, shall be the property of and belong to the city or village to which it is annexed.

Laws 1879, § 94, p. 229;

R.S.1913, § 5085;

C.S.1922, § 4257;

C.S.1929, § 17-406;

R.S.1943, § 17-404;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 109.